Utah statutes.
57-1-30.   Sale of trust property by trustee -- Corporate stock evidencing water rights given to secure trust deed.

Shares of corporate stock evidencing water rights used, intended to be used, or suitable for use on the trust property and which are hypothecated to secure an obligation secured by a trust deed may be sold with the trust property, or any part thereof, at the trustee's sale in the manner provided in this act.

